test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-tigge_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - tigge: # e-stems
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tigettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tigeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: tiigij
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: tigijguin
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tigijttáá
